District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Langston Slater Surplus Declaration and Disposition Approval Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this act, the term:
(1) “Act” means An Act Authorizing the sale of certain real estate in the District
of Columbia no longer required for public purposes, approved August 5, 1939 (53 Stat. 1211;
D.C. Official Code § 10-801 et seq.).
(2) “CBE Act” means the Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development
and Assistance Act of 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code §
2-218.01 et seq.).
(3) “Certified Business Enterprise” means a business enterprise or joint venture
certified pursuant to the CBE Act.
(4) “Developer” means Lebanon Village at Langston Slater MD LLC, with a
business address of 875 N Street, NW, Suite 202, Washington, DC 20001, a District of Columbia
joint venture by and among special purpose entities affiliated with CSG Urban Partners, LLC,
with a business address of 875 N Street, NW, Suite 202, Washington, DC 20001, and special
purpose entities affiliated with Mount Lebanon Community Development Corporation, with a
business address of 2 Massachusetts Avenue, NE, Unit 2142, Washington, DC 20002.
(5) “First Source Agreement” means an agreement with the District governing
certain obligations of the Developer pursuant to section 4 of the First Source Employment
Agreement Act of 1984, effective June 29, 1984 (D.C. Law 5-93; D.C. Official Code § 2-
219.03), and Mayor’s Order 83-265, dated November 9, 1983, regarding job creation and
employment generated as a result of the construction on the Property.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(6) “LDDA” means the draft Land Disposition and Development Agreement
transmitted by the Mayor to the Council on February 28, 2025, with the introduced version of
this act.
(7) “Property” means the real property located at the current address of 33-45 P
Street, NW, and known for tax and assessment purposes as Lot 0827 in Square 0615, which is
improved with 2 former elementary schools, John Fox Slater Elementary School and John
Mercer Langston Elementary School.
Sec. 3. Findings.
(a) The District of Columbia is the owner of the Property.
(b) The Property consists of approximately 30,000 square feet of land.
(c) The Property is no longer required for public purposes.
(d) The District government and the public will benefit substantially from the disposition
of the Property for private development.
(e) The Mayor, through the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
Development (“DMPED”), satisfied the public hearing requirement of section 1(a-1)(4) of the
Act (D.C. Official Code § 10-801(a-1)(4)) by holding a virtual public hearing on February 11,
2021, to obtain community input on potential public uses of the real property to inform the
Mayor’s determination whether the real property is no longer required for public purposes.
(f) The Mayor, through DMPED, has selected the Developer to develop the Property.
(g) The intended development of the Property is for a mixed-income, rental, and for sale
residential development, as further described in the term sheet (“Project”).
(h) The Mayor has proposed that the terms of the disposition of the Property include the
following:
(1) The Developer shall comply with the requirements of section 1(b-3) of the Act
(D.C. Official Code § 10-801(b-3)), by dedicating at least 30% of the residential units in the
Project as affordable housing units;
(2) The Developer shall enter into an agreement that shall require the Developer
to, at a minimum, contract with Certified Business Enterprises for at least 35% of the contract
dollar volume of the Project and shall require at least 20% equity and 20% development
participation of Certified Business Enterprises in the Project, in accordance with section 2349a of
the CBE Act (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.49a) and section 1(b)(6) of the Act (D.C. Official Code
§ 10-801(b)(6)); and
(3) The Developer shall enter into a First Source Agreement.
(i) The method of disposition shall be a ground lease of greater than 15 years for that
portion of the Property where the Developer intends to develop rental residential units and a fee
simple private sale for that portion of the Property where the Developer intends to develop for
sale residential units, as further described in the LDDA documents transmitted by the Mayor to
the Council on February 28, 2025, with the introduced version of this act and the amended term
sheet transmitted on November 21, 2025.
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(j) The LDDA for the disposition of the Property shall not be inconsistent with the
substantive business terms of the transaction transmitted by the Mayor to the Council on
February 28, 2025, with the introduced version of this act and the amended term transmitted on
November 21, 2025, in accordance with section 1(b-1)(2) of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 10-
801(b-1)(2)), unless revisions to those substantive business terms are approved by the Council.
Sec. 4. Surplus declaration and disposition approval.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Council determines that the Property
is no longer required for public purposes and authorizes the Mayor to dispose of the Property.
(b) The authority of the Mayor to dispose of the Property pursuant to this act shall expire
3 years after the effective date of this act.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or, in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813, D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3